Missouri, session 2026, HB3241.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 546.740, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 546.740, to read as follows:
546.740. The chief administrative officer of the correctional center, or his duly
appointed representative, and any judge or juror who declared death as a punishment
shall be present at the execution [and]. The director of the department of corrections shall
invite the presence of the attorney general of the state, and at least eight reputable citizens, to
be selected by him or her; and he or she shall at the request of the defendant, permit such
clergy or religious leaders, not exceeding two, as the defendant may name, and any person,
other than another incarcerated offender, relatives or friends, not to exceed five, to be present
at the execution, together with such peace officers as he or she may think expedient, to
witness the execution; but no person under twenty-one years of age shall be allowed to
witness the execution.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.